District of Columbia statutes.
38-2615

Educator evaluations.

(a)

Individual educator evaluations and effectiveness ratings, observation, and value-added data collected or maintained by OSSE are not public records and shall not be subject to disclosure pursuant to § 2-532.

(b)

Nothing in this section shall prohibit OSSE from:

(1)

Using educator evaluations or effectiveness ratings to fulfill existing requirements of a state educational agency under applicable federal or local law; or

(2)

Publicly disclosing aggregate reports and analyses regarding the results of educator evaluation data.

(c)

For the purposes of this section, the term “educator” means a principal, assistant principal, school teacher, assistant teacher, or a paraprofessional.

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-176, § 7g
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 4062, 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4002(c) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).